Arkansas, session 2025, HB1636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-112. Report on revenues derived from sale of soft drinks.
Within ninety (90) calendar days of the end of each fiscal year, the
Department of Finance and Administration shall estimate the amount of revenue
*JLL166*
03-12-2025 11:53:30 JLL166

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/12/25 HB1636
derived from the gross receipts tax levied by this chapter and the
compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, §
26-53-101 et seq., on soft drinks during the fiscal year.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-57-904(a), concerning the tax rate under
the Arkansas Soft Drink Tax Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected a tax upon
every distributor, manufacturer, or wholesale dealer, to be calculated as
follows:
(1)(A) One dollar and twenty-six cents ($1.26) per gallon for
each gallon of soft drink syrup or simple syrup sold or offered for sale in
the State of Arkansas.
(B)(i) By December 1 of each year, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall determine the amount estimated under § 26-52-112
for the fiscal year ending June 30 of that year.
(ii) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the amount determined under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this
section is at least sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000), the tax levied
under this subdivision (a)(1) shall be ninety-six cents (96¢).
(iii) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(1) shall be seventy-two cents (72¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section is at least twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(1) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(iv) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(1) shall be forty-eight cents (48¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section is at least thirty-four million dollars
03-12-2025 11:53:30 JLL166

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/12/25 HB1636
($34,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(1) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(1)(B)(ii) and (iii) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(v) Beginning July 1 of the year following the first
year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(1) shall be twenty-four cents (24¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section is at least forty-three million dollars
($43,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(1) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(1)(B)(ii)-(iv) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(vi) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(1) shall be zero cents (0¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section is at least fifty-two million dollars
($52,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(1) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(1)(B)(ii)-(v) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year;
(2)(A) Twenty and six-tenths cents (20.6¢) per gallon for each
gallon of bottled soft drinks sold or offered for sale in the State of
Arkansas.
(B)(i) By December 1 of each year, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall determine the amount estimated under § 26-52-112
03-12-2025 11:53:30 JLL166

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/12/25 HB1636
for the fiscal year ending June 30 of that year.
(ii) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the amount determined under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this
section is at least sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000), the tax levied
under this subdivision (a)(2) shall be sixteen cents (16¢).
(iii) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(2) shall be twelve cents (12¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(2)(B)(i) of this section is at least twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(2) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivision (a)(2)(B)(ii) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(iv) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(2) shall be eight cents (8¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(2)(B)(i) of this section is at least thirty-four million dollars
($34,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(2) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(2)(B)(ii) and (iii) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(v) Beginning July 1 of the year following the first
year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(2) shall be four cents (4¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(2)(B)(i) of this section is at least forty-three million dollars
($43,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
03-12-2025 11:53:30 JLL166

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/12/25 HB1636
(a)(2) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(2)(B)(ii)-(iv) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(vi) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(2) shall be zero cents (0¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(2)(B)(i) of this section is at least fifty-two million dollars
($52,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(2) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(2)(B)(ii)-(v) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year; and
(3)(A) When a package or container of powder or other base
product, other than a syrup or simple syrup, is sold or offered for sale in
Arkansas, and the powder is for the purpose of producing a liquid soft drink,
then the tax on the sale of each package or container shall be equal to
twenty and six-tenths cents (20.6¢) for each gallon of soft drink which may
be produced from each package or container by following the manufacturer's
directions.
(B)(i) By December 1 of each year, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall determine the amount estimated under § 26-52-112
for the fiscal year ending June 30 of that year.
(ii) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the amount determined under subdivision (a)(3)(B)(i) of this
section is at least sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000), the tax levied
under this subdivision (a)(3) shall be sixteen cents (16¢).
(iii) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(3) shall be twelve cents (12¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(3)(B)(i) of this section is at least twenty-five million dollars
03-12-2025 11:53:30 JLL166

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/12/25 HB1636
($25,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(3) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivision (a)(3)(B)(ii) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(iv) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(3) shall be eight cents (8¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(3)(B)(i) of this section is at least thirty-four million dollars
($34,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(3) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(3)(B)(ii) and (iii) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(v) Beginning July 1 of the year following the first
year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(3) shall be four cents (4¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(3)(B)(i) of this section is at least forty-three million dollars
($43,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(3) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(3)(B)(ii)-(iv) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(vi) Beginning July 1 of the year following the
first year that the following conditions are met, the tax levied under this
subdivision (a)(3) shall be zero cents (0¢):
(a) The amount determined under subdivision
(a)(3)(B)(i) of this section is at least fifty-two million dollars
03-12-2025 11:53:30 JLL166

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/12/25 HB1636
($52,000,000); and
(b) The tax levied under this subdivision
(a)(3) has:
(1) Already been reduced under
subdivisions (a)(3)(B)(ii)-(v) of this section; and
(2) Not already been reduced under this
section during the current fiscal year.
(C) This tax applies when the sale of the powder or other
base is sold to a retailer for sale to the ultimate consumer after the liquid
soft drink is produced by the retailer.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Repeal — Removal from Arkansas Code.
When all taxes levied under the Arkansas Soft Drink Tax Act, Arkansas
Code § 26-57-901 et seq., have been reduced to a rate of zero cents (0¢),
the:
(1) Arkansas Soft Drink Tax Act, Arkansas Code § 26-57-901 et
seq. is repealed;
(2) Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall notify the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research and the
Arkansas Code Revision Commission; and
(3) Upon notification from the secretary under this section, the
commission may remove the Arkansas Soft Drink Tax Act, Arkansas Code § 26-57-
901 et seq., from the Arkansas Code.

/s/Ray











03-12-2025 11:53:30 JLL166